Montana, session 2025, LC2579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 15-6-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-201. Governmental, charitable, and educational categories -- exempt property. (1) The
following categories of property are exempt from taxation:
(a) except as provided in 15-24-1203, the property of:
(i) the United States, except:
(A) if congress passes legislation that allows the state to tax property owned by the federal
government or an agency created by congress; or
(B) as provided in 15-24-1103;
(ii) the state, counties, cities, towns, and school districts;
(iii) irrigation districts organized under the laws of Montana and not operated for gain or profit;
(iv) municipal corporations;
(v) public libraries;
(vi) rural fire districts and other entities providing fire protection under Title 7, chapter 33;
(vii) special districts created pursuant to Title 7, chapter 11, part 10; and
(viii) subject to subsection (2), federally recognized Indian tribes in the state if the property is located
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
entirely within the exterior boundaries of the reservation of the tribe that owns the property and the property is
used exclusively by the tribe for essential government services. Essential government services are tribal
government administration, fire, police, public health, education, recreation, sewer, water, pollution control,
public transit, and public parks and recreational facilities.
(b) buildings and furnishings in the buildings that are owned by a church and used for actual
religious worship or for residences of the clergy, not to exceed one residence for each member of the clergy,
together with the land that the buildings occupy and adjacent land reasonably necessary for convenient use of
the buildings, which must be identified in the application, and all land and improvements used for educational or
youth recreational activities if the facilities are generally available for use by the general public but may not
exceed 15 acres for a church or 1 acre for a clergy residence after subtracting any area required by zoning,
building codes, or subdivision requirements;
(c) land and improvements upon the land, not to exceed 15 acres, owned by a federally
recognized Indian tribe when the land has been set aside by tribal resolution and designated as sacred land to
be used exclusively for religious purposes;
(d) property owned and used exclusively for agricultural and horticultural societies not operated for
gain or profit;
(e) property, not to exceed 80 acres, which must be legally described in the application for the
exemption, used exclusively for educational purposes, including dormitories and food service buildings for the
use of students in attendance and other structures necessary for the operation and maintenance of an
educational institution that:
(i) is not operated for gain or profit;
(ii) has an attendance policy; and
(iii) has a definable curriculum with systematic instruction;
(f) property, of any acreage, owned by a tribal corporation created for the sole purpose of
establishing schools, colleges, and universities if the property meets the requirements of subsection (1)(e);
(g) property used exclusively for nonprofit health care facilities, as defined in 50-5-101, licensed by
the department of public health and human services and organized under Title 35, chapter 2 or 3. A health care
facility that is not licensed by the department of public health and human services and organized under Title 35,
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
chapter 2 or 3, is not exempt.
(h) property that is:
(i) (A) owned and held by an association or corporation organized under Title 35, chapter 2, 3, 20,
or 21; or
(B) owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe within the state and set aside by tribal resolution;
and
(ii) devoted exclusively to use in connection with a cemetery or cemeteries for which a permanent
care and improvement fund has been established as provided for in Title 35, chapter 20, part 3; and
(iii) not maintained and not operated for gain or profit;
(i) subject to subsection (2), property that is owned or property that is leased from a federal, state,
or local governmental entity by institutions of purely public charity if the property is directly used for purely
public charitable purposes;
(j) evidence of debt secured by mortgages of record upon real or personal property in the state of
Montana;
(k) public museums, art galleries, zoos, and observatories that are not operated for gain or profit;
(l) motor vehicles, land, fixtures, buildings, and improvements owned by a cooperative association
or nonprofit corporation organized to furnish potable water to its members or customers for uses other than the
irrigation of agricultural land;
(m) the right of entry that is a property right reserved in land or received by mesne conveyance
(exclusive of leasehold interests), devise, or succession to enter land with a surface title that is held by another
to explore, prospect, or dig for oil, gas, coal, or minerals;
(n) (i) property that is owned and used by a corporation or association organized and operated
exclusively for the care of persons with developmental disabilities, persons with mental illness, or persons with
physical or mental impairments that constitute or result in substantial impediments to employment and that is
not operated for gain or profit; and
(ii) subject to subsection (2)(e), property that is owned and used by an organization owning and
operating facilities that are for the care of the retired, aged, or chronically ill and that are not operated for gain or
profit;
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
(o) property owned by a nonprofit corporation that is organized to provide facilities primarily for
training and practice for or competition in international sports and athletic events and that is not held or used for
private or corporate gain or profit. For purposes of this subsection (1)(o), "nonprofit corporation" means an
organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and incorporated
and admitted under the Montana Nonprofit Corporation Act.
(p) property rented or leased to a municipality or taxing unit for less than $100 a year and that is
used for public park, recreation, or landscape beautification purposes. For the purposes of this subsection
(1)(p), "property" includes land but does not include buildings. The exemption must be applied for by the
municipality or taxing unit, and not more than 10 acres within the municipality or taxing unit may be exempted.
(2) (a) (i) For the purposes of tribal property under subsection (1)(a)(viii), the property subject to
exemption may not be:
(A) operated for gain or profit;
(B) held under contract to operate, lease, or sell by a taxable individual;
(C) used or possessed exclusively by a taxable individual or entity; or
(D) held by a tribal corporation except for educational purposes as provided in subsection (1)(f).
(ii) For the purposes of parks and recreational facilities under subsection (1)(a)(viii), the property
must be:
(A) set aside by tribal resolution and designated as park land, not to exceed 640 acres, or be
designated as a recreational facility; and
(B) open to the general public.
(b) For the purposes of subsection (1)(b), the term "clergy" means, as recognized under the
federal Internal Revenue Code:
(i) an ordained minister, priest, or rabbi;
(ii) a commissioned or licensed minister of a church or church denomination that ordains ministers
if the person has the authority to perform substantially all the religious duties of the church or denomination;
(iii) a member of a religious order who has taken a vow of poverty; or
(iv) a Christian Science practitioner.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (1)(i):
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
(i) the term "institutions of purely public charity" includes any organization that meets the following
requirements:
(A) The organization offers its charitable goods or services to persons without regard to race,
religion, creed, or gender and qualifies as a tax-exempt organization under the provisions of section 501(c)(3),
Internal Revenue Code, as amended.
(B) The organization accomplishes its activities through absolute gratuity or grants. However, the
organization may solicit or raise funds by the sale of merchandise, memberships, or tickets to public
performances or entertainment or by other similar types of fundraising activities.
(ii) agricultural property owned by a purely public charity is not exempt if the agricultural property is
used by the charity to produce unrelated business taxable income as that term is defined in section 512 of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 512. A public charity claiming an exemption for agricultural property shall file
annually with the department a copy of its federal tax return reporting any unrelated business taxable income
received by the charity during the tax year, together with a statement indicating whether the exempt property
was used to generate any unrelated business taxable income.
(iii) up to 15 acres of property owned by a purely public charity is exempt at the time of its purchase
even if the property must be improved before it can directly be used for its intended charitable purpose. If the
property is not directly used for the charitable purpose within 8 years of receiving an exemption under this
section or if the property is sold or transferred before it entered direct charitable use, the exemption is revoked
and the property is taxable. In addition to taxes due for the first year that the property becomes taxable, the
owner of the property shall pay an amount equal to the amount of the tax due that year times the number of
years that the property was tax-exempt under this section. The amount due is a lien upon the property and
when collected must be distributed by the treasurer to funds and accounts in the same ratio as property tax
collected on the property is distributed. At the time the exemption is granted, the department shall file a notice
with the clerk and recorder in the county in which the property is located. The notice must indicate that an
exemption pursuant to this section has been granted. The notice must describe the penalty for default under
this section and must specify that a default under this section will create a lien on the property by operation of
law. The notice must be on a form prescribed by the department.
(iv) not more than 160 acres may be exempted by a purely public charity under any exemption
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
originally applied for after December 31, 2004. An application for exemption under this section must contain a
legal description of the property for which the exemption is requested.
(d) For the purposes of subsection (1)(k), the term "public museums, art galleries, zoos, and
observatories" means governmental entities or nonprofit organizations whose principal purpose is to hold
property for public display or for use as a museum, art gallery, zoo, or observatory. The exempt property
includes all real and personal property owned by the public museum, art gallery, zoo, or observatory that is
reasonably necessary for use in connection with the public display or observatory use. Unless the property is
leased for a profit to a governmental entity or nonprofit organization by an individual or for-profit organization,
real and personal property owned by other persons is exempt if it is:
(i) actually used by the governmental entity or nonprofit organization as a part of its public display;
(ii) held for future display; or
(iii) used to house or store a public display.
(e) For the purposes of facilities for the care of the retired, aged, or chronically ill under subsection
(1)(n)(ii), the terms "retired" and "aged" mean an individual who satisfies the age and gross household income
limitations of 15-30-2338 and is 62 years of age or older. The property owner shall verify age and gross
household income requirements on a form prescribed by the department. Applicants are subject to the false
swearing penalties established in 45-7-202."

Section 2. Section 15-7-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-7-102. Notice of classification, market value, and taxable value to owners -- appeals. (1) (a)
Except as provided in 15-7-138, the department shall mail or provide electronically to each owner or purchaser
under contract for deed a notice that includes the land classification, market value, and taxable value of the
land and improvements owned or being purchased. A notice must be mailed or, with property owner consent,
provided electronically to the owner only if one or more of the following changes pertaining to the land or
improvements have been made since the last notice:
(i) change in ownership;
(ii) change in classification;
(iii) change in valuation; or
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
(iv) addition or subtraction of personal property affixed to the land.
(b) The notice must include the following for the taxpayer's informational and informal classification
and appraisal review purposes:
(i) a notice of the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property
taxpayers, including the intangible land value assistance program provided for in 15-6-240, the property tax
assistance programs provided for in Title 15, chapter 6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the
elderly provided for in 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341;
(ii) the total amount of mills levied against the property in the prior year;
(iii) the market value for the prior reappraisal cycle;
(iv) if the market value has increased by more than 10%, an explanation for the increase in
valuation;
(v) a statement that the notice is not a tax bill; and
(vi) a taxpayer option to request an informal classification and appraisal review by checking a box
on the notice and returning it to the department.
(c) When the department uses an appraisal method that values land and improvements as a unit,
including the sales comparison approach for residential condominiums or the income approach for commercial
property, the notice must contain a combined appraised value of land and improvements.
(d) Any misinformation provided in the information required by subsection (1)(b) does not affect the
validity of the notice and may not be used as a basis for a challenge of the legality of the notice.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(c), the department shall assign each classification and
appraisal to the correct owner or purchaser under contract for deed and mail or provide electronically the notice
in written or electronic form, adopted by the department, containing sufficient information in a comprehensible
manner designed to fully inform the taxpayer as to the classification and appraisal of the property and of
changes over the prior tax year.
(b) The notice must advise the taxpayer that in order to be eligible for a refund of taxes from an
appeal of the classification or appraisal, the taxpayer is required to pay the taxes under protest as provided in
15-1-402.
(c) The department is not required to mail or provide electronically the notice to a new owner or
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
purchaser under contract for deed unless the department has received the realty transfer certificate from the
clerk and recorder as provided in 15-7-304 and has processed the certificate before the notices required by
subsection (2)(a) are mailed or provided electronically. The department shall notify the county tax appeal board
of the date of the mailing or the date when the taxpayer is informed the information is available electronically.
(3) (a) If the owner of any land and improvements is dissatisfied with the appraisal as it reflects the
market value of the property as determined by the department or with the classification of the land or
improvements, the owner may request an informal classification and appraisal review by submitting an
objection on written or electronic forms provided by the department for that purpose or by checking a box on the
notice and returning it to the department in a manner prescribed by the department.
(i) For property other than class three property described in 15-6-133, class four property
described in 15-6-134, class ten property described in 15-6-143, and centrally assessed property described in
15-23-101, the objection must be submitted within 30 days from the date on the notice.
(ii) For class three property described in 15-6-133, class four property described in 15-6-134, and
class ten property described in 15-6-143, the objection may be made only once each valuation cycle. An
objection must be made in writing or by checking a box on the notice within 30 days from the date on the
classification and appraisal notice for a reduction in the appraised value to be considered for both years of the
2-year valuation cycle. An objection made more than 30 days from the date of the classification and appraisal
notice will be applicable only for the second year of the 2-year valuation cycle. For an objection to apply to the
second year of the valuation cycle, the taxpayer shall make the objection in writing or by checking a box on the
notice no later than June 1 of the second year of the valuation cycle or, if a classification and appraisal notice is
received in the second year of the valuation cycle, within 30 days from the date on the notice.
(iii) For centrally assessed property described in 15-23-101(2)(a), the objection must be submitted
within 20 days from the date on the notice. A taxpayer may submit an objection up to 10 days after this deadline
on request to the department.
(iv) (A) For centrally assessed property described in 15-23-101(2)(b) and (2)(c), an objection to the
valuation or classification may be made only once each valuation cycle. An objection must be made in writing
within the time period specified in subsection (3)(a)(iii) for a reduction in the appraised value to be considered
for both years of the 2-year valuation cycle. An objection made after the deadline specified in subsection
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
(3)(a)(iii) will be applicable only for the second year of the 2-year valuation cycle. For an objection to apply to
the second year of the valuation cycle, the taxpayer shall make the objection in writing no later than June 1 of
the second year of the valuation cycle or, if a classification and appraisal notice is received in the second year
of the valuation cycle, within the time period specified in subsection (3)(a)(iii).
(B) If a property owner has exhausted the right to object to a valuation, as provided for in
subsection (3)(a)(iv)(A), the property owner may ask the department to consider extenuating circumstances to
adjust the value of property described in 15-23-101(2)(b) or (2)(c). Occurrences that may result in an
adjustment to the value include but are not limited to extraordinary, unusual, or infrequent events that are
material in nature and of a character different from the typical or customary business operations, that are not
expected to recur frequently, and that are not normally considered in the evaluation of the operating results of a
business, including bankruptcies, acquisitions, sales of assets, or mergers.
(b) If the objection relates to residential or commercial property and the objector agrees to the
confidentiality requirements, the department shall provide to the objector, by posted mail or electronically, within
8 weeks of submission of the objection, the following information:
(i) the methodology and sources of data used by the department in the valuation of the property;
and
(ii) if the department uses a blend of evaluations developed from various sources, the reasons that
the methodology was used.
(c) At the request of the objector or a representative of the objector, and only if the objector or
representative signs a written or electronic confidentiality agreement, the department shall provide in written or
electronic form:
(i) comparable sales data used by the department to value the property;
(ii) sales data used by the department to value residential property in the property taxpayer's
market model area; and
(iii) if the cost approach was used by the department to value residential property, the
documentation required in 15-8-111(3) regarding why the comparable sales approach was not reliable.
(d) For properties valued using the income approach as one approximation of market value, notice
must be provided that the taxpayer will be given a form to acknowledge confidentiality requirements for the
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
receipt of all aggregate model output that the department used in the valuation model for the property.
(e) The review must be conducted informally and is not subject to the contested case procedures
of the Montana Administrative Procedure Act. As a part of the review, the department may consider the actual
selling price of the property and other relevant information presented by the taxpayer in support of the
taxpayer's opinion as to the market value of the property. The department shall consider an independent
appraisal provided by the taxpayer if the appraisal meets standards set by the Montana board of real estate
appraisers and the appraisal was completed within 6 months of the valuation date pursuant to 15-8-201. If the
department does not use the appraisal provided by the taxpayer in conducting the appeal, the department shall
provide to the taxpayer the reason for not using the appraisal. The department shall give reasonable notice to
the taxpayer of the time and place of the review.
(f) After the review, the department shall determine the correct appraisal and classification of the
land or improvements and notify the taxpayer of its determination by mail or electronically. The department may
not determine an appraised value that is higher than the value that was the subject of the objection unless the
reason for an increase was the result of a physical change in the property or caused by an error in the
description of the property or data available for the property that is kept by the department and used for
calculating the appraised value. In the notification, the department shall state its reasons for revising the
classification or appraisal. When the proper appraisal and classification have been determined, the land must
be classified and the improvements appraised in the manner ordered by the department.
(4) Whether a review as provided in subsection (3) is held or not, the department may not adjust
an appraisal or classification upon the taxpayer's objection unless:
(a) the taxpayer has submitted an objection on written or electronic forms provided by the
department or by checking a box on the notice; and
(b) the department has provided to the objector by mail or electronically its stated reason in writing
for making the adjustment.
(5) A taxpayer's written objection or objection made by checking a box on the notice and
supplemental information provided by a taxpayer that elects to check a box on the notice to a classification or
appraisal and the department's notification to the taxpayer of its determination and the reason for that
determination are public records. The department shall make the records available for inspection during regular
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
office hours.
(6) Except as provided in 15-2-302 and 15-23-102, if a property owner feels aggrieved by the
classification or appraisal made by the department after the review provided for in subsection (3), the property
owner has the right to first appeal to the county tax appeal board and then to the Montana tax appeal board,
whose findings are final subject to the right of review in the courts. The appeal to the county tax appeal board,
pursuant to 15-15-102, must be filed within 30 days from the date on the notice of the department's
determination. A county tax appeal board or the Montana tax appeal board may consider the actual selling price
of the property, independent appraisals of the property, negative property features that differentiate the subject
property from the department's comparable sales, and other relevant information presented by the taxpayer as
evidence of the market value of the property. If the county tax appeal board or the Montana tax appeal board
determines that an adjustment should be made, the department shall adjust the base value of the property in
accordance with the board's order."

Section 3. Section 15-16-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-16-101. Treasurer to publish notice -- manner of publication. (1) Within 10 days after the
receipt of the property tax record, the county treasurer shall publish a notice specifying:
(a) that one-half of all taxes levied and assessed will be due and payable before 5 p.m. on the next
November 30 or within 30 days after the notice is postmarked and that unless paid prior to that time the amount
then due will be delinquent and will draw interest at the rate of 5/6 of 1% a month from the time of delinquency
until paid and 2% will be added to the delinquent taxes as a penalty;
(b) that one-half of all taxes levied and assessed will be due and payable on or before 5 p.m. on
the next May 31 and that unless paid prior to that time the taxes will be delinquent and will draw interest at the
rate of 5/6 of 1% a month from the time of delinquency until paid and 2% will be added to the delinquent taxes
as a penalty; and
(c) the time and place at which payment of taxes may be made.
(2) (a) The county treasurer shall send to the last-known address of each taxpayer a written notice,
postage prepaid, showing the amount of taxes and assessments due for the current year and the amount due
and delinquent for other years. The written notice must include:
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
(i) the taxable value of the property;
(ii) the total mill levy applied to that taxable value;
(iii) itemized city services and special improvement district assessments collected by the county;
(iv) the number of the school district in which the property is located;
(v) the amount of the total tax due itemized by mill levy that is levied as city tax, county tax, state
tax, school district tax, and other tax;
(vi) an indication of which mill levies are voted levies, including voted levies to impose a new mill
levy, to increase a mill levy that is required to be submitted to the electors, or to exceed the mill levy limit
provided for in 15-10-420;
(vii) except as provided in subsection (2)(c), an itemization of the taxes due for each mill levy and a
comparison to the amount due for each mill levy in the prior year; and
(viii) a notice of the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property
taxpayers, including the intangible land value assistance program provided for in 15-6-240, the property tax
assistance programs under Title 15, chapter 6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the elderly
under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341.
(b) If a tax lien is attached to the property, the notice must also include, in a manner calculated to
draw attention, a statement that a tax lien is attached to the property, that failure to respond will result in loss of
property, and that the taxpayer may contact the county treasurer for complete information.
(c) The information required in subsection (2)(a)(vii) may be posted on the county treasurer's
website instead of being included on the written notice.
(3) The municipality shall, upon request of the county treasurer, provide the information to be
included under subsection (2)(a)(iii) ready for mailing.
(4) The notice in every case must be given as provided in 7-1-2121. Failure to publish or post
notices does not relieve the taxpayer from any tax liability. Any failure to give notice of the tax due for the
current year or of delinquent tax will not affect the legality of the tax.
(5) If the department revises an assessment that results in an additional tax of $5 or less, an
additional tax is not owed and a new tax bill does not need to be prepared."

- 12 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
Section 4. Section 15-17-125, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-17-125. Attachment of tax lien and preparation of tax lien certificate. (1) (a) The county
treasurer shall attach a tax lien no later than the first working day in August to properties on which the taxes are
delinquent and for which proper notification was given as provided in 15-17-122 and subsection (4) of this
section. Upon attachment of a tax lien, the county is the possessor of the tax lien unless the tax lien is assigned
pursuant to 15-17-323.
(b) The county treasurer may not attach a tax lien to a property on which taxes are delinquent but
for which proper notice was not given.
(2) After attaching a tax lien, the county treasurer shall prepare a tax lien certificate that must
contain:
(a) the date on which the property taxes became delinquent;
(b) the date on which a property tax lien was attached to the property;
(c) the name and address of record of the person to whom the taxes were assessed;
(d) a description of the property on which the taxes were assessed;
(e) a separate listing of the amount of the delinquent taxes, penalties, interest, and costs;
(f) a statement that the tax lien certificate represents a lien on the property that may lead to the
issuance of a tax deed for the property;
(g) a statement specifying the date on which the county or an assignee will be entitled to a tax
deed; and
(h) an identification number corresponding to the tax lien certificate.
(3) The tax lien certificate must be signed by the county treasurer. A copy of the tax lien certificate
must be filed by the treasurer in the office of the county clerk. A copy of the tax lien certificate must also be
mailed to the person to whom the taxes were assessed, at the address of record, together with a notice that the
person may contact the county treasurer for further information on property tax liens.
(4) Prior to attaching a tax lien to the property, the county treasurer shall send notice of the
pending attachment of a tax lien to the person to whom the property was assessed. The notice must include the
information listed in subsection (2), state that the tax lien may be assigned to a third party, and provide notice of
the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property taxpayers, including the
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
property tax assistance programs under Title 15, chapter 6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the
elderly under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341. The notice must have been mailed at least 2 weeks prior to the
date on which the county treasurer attaches the tax lien.
(5) The county treasurer shall file the tax lien certificate with the county clerk and recorder."

Section 5. Section 15-30-2303, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-30-2303. Tax credits subject to review by interim committee. (1) The following tax credits
must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2021, and during each biennium commencing 8
years thereafter:
(a) the credit for donations to innovative educational programs provided for in 15-30-2334, 15-30-
3110, and 15-31-158;
(b) the credit for donations to a student scholarship organization provided for in 15-30-2335, 15-
30-3111, and 15-31-159; and
(c) the adoption tax credit provided for in 15-30-2321.
(2) The following tax credits must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2023, and
during each biennium commencing 8 years thereafter:
(a) the credit for infrastructure use fees provided for in 17-6-316;
(b) the credit for contributions to a qualified endowment provided for in 15-30-2327 through 15-30-
2329, 15-31-161, and 15-31-162;
(c) the credit for property to recycle or manufacture using recycled material provided for in Title 15,
chapter 32, part 6; and
(d) the credit for preservation of historic buildings provided for in 15-30-2342 and 15-31-151.
(3) The following tax credits must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2025, and
during each biennium commencing 8 years thereafter:
(a) the residential property tax credit for the elderly provided for in 15-30-2337 through 15-30-
2341;
(b) the credit for unlocking state lands provided for in 15-30-2380;
(c) the job growth incentive tax credit provided for in 15-30-2361 and 15-31-175; and
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
(d) the credit for trades education and training provided for in 15-30-2359 and 15-31-174.
(4) The following tax credits must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2027, and
during each biennium commencing 8 years thereafter:
(a) the credit for hiring a registered apprentice or veteran apprentice provided for in 15-30-2357
and 15-31-173;
(b) the earned income tax credit provided for in 15-30-2318;
(c) the media production and postproduction credits provided for in 15-31-1007 and 15-31-1009;
and
(d) the credit for contractor's gross receipts provided for in 15-50-207.
(5) The revenue interim committee shall review the tax credits scheduled for review and make
recommendations in accordance with 5-11-210 at the conclusion of the full review to the legislature about
whether to eliminate or revise the credits. The committee shall also review any tax credit with an expiration date
or termination date that is not listed in this section in the biennium before the credit is scheduled to expire or
terminate.
(6) The revenue interim committee shall review the credits using the following criteria:
(a) whether the credit changes taxpayer decisions, including whether the credit rewards decisions
that may have been made regardless of the existence of the tax credit;
(b) to what extent the credit benefits some taxpayers at the expense of other taxpayers;
(c) whether the credit has out-of-state beneficiaries;
(d) the timing of costs and benefits of the credit and how long the credit is effective;
(e) any adverse impacts of the credit or its elimination and whether the benefits of continuance or
elimination outweigh adverse impacts; and
(f) the extent to which benefits of the credit affect the larger economy. (Subsection (3)(c)
terminates December 31, 2028--sec. 4, Ch. 391, L. 2023; subsection (3)(d) terminates December 31, 2028--
sec. 2, Ch. 576, L. 2023; subsection (1)(c) terminates December 31, 2031--sec. 6, Ch. 493, L. 2023.)"

Section 6. Section 15-30-2338, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-30-2338. Residential property tax credit for elderly -- eligibility -- disallowance or
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
adjustment. (1) In order to be eligible to make a claim under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341, an individual:
(a) must have reached age 62 or older during the claim period for which relief is sought;
(b)(a) must have resided in Montana for at least 9 months of that the claim period for which relief is
sought;
(c)(b) must have occupied one or more dwellings in Montana as an owner, renter, or lessee for at
least 6 months of the claim period; and
(d)(c) must have less than $45,000 $49,600 of gross household income.
(2) A person is not disqualified as a claimant if the person changes residences during the claim
period, provided that the person occupies one or more dwellings in Montana as an owner, renter, or lessee for
at least 6 months during the claim period.
(3) A claim is disallowed if the department finds that the claimant received title to the claimant's
homestead primarily for the purpose of receiving benefits under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341.
(4) When the landlord and tenant have not dealt at arm's length and the department judges the
gross rent charged to be excessive, the department may adjust the gross rent to a reasonable amount."

Section 7. Section 15-30-2340, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-30-2340. Residential property tax credit for elderly -- computation of relief. The amount of
the tax credit granted under the provisions of 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341 is computed as follows:
(1) In Subject to subsection (5), in the case of a claimant who owns the homestead for which a
claim is made, the credit is the amount of property tax billed less the deduction specified in subsection (4).
(2) In Subject to subsection (5), in the case of a claimant who rents the homestead for which a
claim is made, the credit is the amount of rent-equivalent tax paid less the deduction specified in subsection (4).
(3) In Subject to subsection (5), in the case of a claimant who both owns and rents the homestead
for which a claim is made, the credit is:
(a) the amount of property tax billed on the owned portion of the homestead less the deduction
specified in subsection (4); plus
(b) the amount of rent-equivalent tax paid on the rented portion of the homestead less the
deduction specified in subsection (4).
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
(4) Property tax billed and rent-equivalent tax paid are reduced according to the following
schedule:
Household income Amount of reduction
$0 - $999 $0
$1,000 - $1,999 $0
$2,000 - $2,999 the product of .006 times the household income
$3,000 - $3,999 the product of .016 times the household income
$4,000 - $4,999 the product of .024 times the household income
$5,000 - $5,999 the product of .028 times the household income
$6,000 - $6,999 the product of .032 times the household income
$7,000 - $7,999 the product of .035 times the household income
$8,000 - $8,999 the product of .039 times the household income
$9,000 - $9,999 the product of .042 times the household income
$10,000 - $10,999 the product of .045 times the household income
$11,000 - $11,999 the product of .048 times the household income
$12,000 & over the product of .050 times the household income
(5) For a claimant whose household income is $35,000 $39,600 or more but less than $45,000
$49,600, the amount of the credit is equal to the credit calculated under this section multiplied by the decimal
equivalent of a percentage figure according to the following table:
Gross household income Percentage of credit allowed
$35,000 - $37,500 $39,600 - $42,100 40%
$37,501 - $40,000 $42,101 - $44,600 30%
$40,001 - $42,500 $44,601 - $47,100 20%
$42,501 - $44,999 $47,101 - $49,599 10%
$45,000 $49,600 or more 0%
(6) The credit granted may not exceed [$1,150] $1,250.
(7) Relief under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341 is a credit against the claimant's Montana
individual income tax liability for the claim period. If the amount of the credit exceeds the claimant's liability
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
under this chapter, the amount of the excess must be refunded to the claimant. The credit may be claimed even
though the claimant has no income taxable under this chapter. (Bracketed language in subsection (6) is
temporarily amended to "$1,000" on occurrence of contingency for income tax years 2022, 2023, 2024, and
2025 until December 31, 2025--sec. 13, Ch. 476, L. 2021.)"

Section 8. Section 11, Chapter 476, Laws of 2021, is amended to read:
"Section 11. Effective dates -- applicability. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (6),
[this act] is effective July 1, 2021.
(2) [Sections 1 and 6] are effective October 1, 2021, and apply to the income tax year beginning
after December 31, 2021.
(3) [Sections 2 and 7] are effective October 1, 2022, and apply to the income tax year beginning
after December 31, 2022.
(4) [Sections 3 and 8] are effective October 1, 2023, and apply to the income tax year beginning
after December 31, 2023.
(5) [Sections 4 and 9] are [Section 4] is effective October 1, 2024, and apply applies to the income
tax year beginning after December 31, 2024.
(6) [Sections 5 and 10] are [Section 5] is effective October 1, 2025, and apply applies to the
income tax years beginning after December 31, 2025."

Section 9. Section 12, Chapter 476, Laws of 2021, is amended to read:
"Section 12. Termination. (1) [Sections 1 and 6] terminate December 31, 2022.
(2) [Sections 2 and 7] terminate December 31, 2023.
(3) [Sections 3 and 8] terminate December 31, 2024.
(4) [Sections 4 and 9] terminate [Section 4] terminates December 31, 2025.
(5) [Section 13] terminates January 1, 2025."

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Repealer. Sections 9 and 10, Chapter 476, Laws of 2021, are repealed.

- 18 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2579.1
NEW SECTION. Section 11. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Retroactive applicability. [This act] applies retroactively, within the
meaning of 1-2-109, to income tax years beginning after December 31, 2024.
- END -
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – ****